California, session 20252026, AB857.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 1 (commencing with Section 44675) is added to Chapter 3.1 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 1. Cultural Competency Training44675. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop an online cultural competency training delivery platform and online cultural competency training curriculum for school employees to support pupils of color.(b) Local educational agencies shall do all of the following:(1) Provide Commencing with the 2027–28 school year and continuing through the 2031–32 school year, provide and require at least one hour of the training developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) to all school employees as follows: annually.(A)For all current school employees, within the 2027–28 school year.(B)(i)Except as provided in clause (ii), for all school employees hired during or after the 2027–28 school year, within six weeks of commencing employment.(ii)Employees may provide a proof of completion for a cultural competency training completed while employed at another local educational agency to satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph.(2) Provide a proof of completion to school employees that complete the training and maintain records documenting the date that each employee satisfied the requirements of this section.(3) Ensure that all school employees complete the training required by this section on paid time during the employees’ regular work hours or designated professional development hours unless otherwise negotiated and mutually agreed upon with the employees’ exclusive representative.(c) (1) A teacher or certificated employee shall be exempt from the annual requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) if the teacher or certificated employee has a valid English learner authorization, Crosscultural, Language, and Academic Development certificate, or bilingual authorization that was issued within the last 10 years.(2) Employees may provide a proof of completion for a cultural competency training completed while employed at another local educational agency to satisfy the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for the applicable year.(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local educational agency from providing longer, more frequent, relevant in-service training to meet the online training standards, provided that it is mutually agreed upon with the employees’ exclusive representative.(e) The department shall monitor compliance with the training required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) through its existing annual compliance monitoring of state and federal programs.(f) (1) The department shall provide a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within nine months after the conclusion of the 2031–32 school year, summarizing the data collected through compliance monitoring over a five-year period, including the local educational agencies selected for monitoring and relevant compliance findings, if any, pursuant to this section. The department shall publicly post the report on its internet website.(2) The report required by paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c)(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Cultural competency” means the active engagement in an ongoing process of self-reflection that informs deeper understanding and respect of cultural differences where an increase in cultural competency can lead to behaviors, programs, policies, practices, and services that are more culturally appropriate.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.44675.3. This article shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.